Tables/Contraction/en-us-g2.ctb
# the letter p
always p 1234
always P 1234
always paid 1234-145
contraction pd
begword painst 1234-1-35-234-2345 painstake
begword palingen 1234-1-123-35-1245-26 palingenesis (new birth)
sufword panther 1234-1-1345-2346-1235 pantheresque
always part 5-1234
begword parta 1234-345-2345-1 partake
begword parthe 1234-345-2346 Parthenon, Parthenia
word parthy 1234-345-1456-13456 diminutive of Parthenia
begword parto 1234-345-2345-135
begword peacen 1234-2-14-15-1345 peacenik
begword pedic 1234-1246-24-14 pedicure, pedicab, pedicle
begword pedo 1234-1246-135 pedometer, pedobaptist
sufword peebles 1234-15-15-3456-234 Peeblesshire
word people 1234
always perceive 1234-12456-14-1236
word percv =
word percvd =
word percvr =
word percvs =
word percvst =
word percvth =
always perceiving 1234-12456-14-1236-1245
word percvg =
always perhaps 1234-12456-125
word perh =
word perin 1234-12456-35
word perin's 1234-12456-35-3-234
word perins 1234-12456-35-234
begword persever 1234-12456-234-15-1236-12456 persevere
sufword petar 1234-15-2345-345 petard
always pher 1234-125-12456 cyphered
word phoneme =
word phonemes =
word phoney =
begword phonemi = phonemic
begword phospho = phosphofructokinase
sufword picoult 1234-24-14-1256-123-2345 Jodi Picoult, an author
begword pinea 1234-35-15-1 pineapple
word pineal 1234-35-2-123
sufword pipedream 1234-24-1234-15-145-1235-2-134
sufword poleax =
begword portho = porthole
sufword porthos 1234-135-1235-1456-135-234 (Dumas) Porthosesque
begword poth = pothole pothook pothouse
sufword pother 1234-135-2346-1235
sufword potherb 1234-135-2345-125-12456-12
begword pre =
sufword preace 1234-1235-2-14-15 obsolete for press
always preach 1234-1235-2-16
sufword preakness 1234-1235-2-13-56-234
word pred 1234-1235-1246 liquid pred: prednisone trade name
sufword predator 1234-1235-1246-1-2345-135-1235
sufword predecessor 1234-1235-1246-15-14-15-234-234-135-1235
begword predicat 1234-1235-1246-24-14-1-2345 predicated
sufword predication 1234-1235-1246-24-14-6-1345
sufword predikant 1234-1235-1246-24-13-1-1345-2345
begword predn 1234-1235-1246-1345 prednisone prednisolone
sufword predsolan 1234-1235-1246-234-135-123-1-1345
begword preer = preerect
begword prefulg = prefulgence prefulgent
word pren 1234-1235-26 a surname
begword prend 1234-1235-26-145 prendergast
sufword prensa 1234-1235-26-234-1
sufword prent 1234-1235-26-2345
sufword prepsychedelic 1234-1235-15-1234-234-13456-16-15-145-15-123-24-14
always prof =
word prof 1234-1235-12356
sufword profanation 1234-1235-12356-1-1345-6-1345
sufword proff 1234-1235-12356-124 proffer
begword profliga 1234-1235-12356-123-24-1245-1 profligate profligacy
word profs 1234-1235-12356-234
always profit 1234-1235-12356-24-2345
begword proto = protoenchanter (Cervantes)
sufword prounion = prounionist
begword psyched 1234-234-13456-16-15-145 psychedelic
word pulseaudio =

# the letter q
always q 12345
always Q 12345
always quick 12345-13
contraction qk
word quite 12345
always question 5-12345

# the letter r
always r 1235
always R 1235
sufword radio = radiofrequencies
sufword rafter 1235-1-124-2345-12456
word rather 1235
begword ratho = rathole
sufword raw = rawhide
endnum rd = (third)
begword reab = reabsorbed
begword reacc 1235-15-1-25 reaccelerate
always reach 1235-2-16
begword reachiev 1235-15-1-16-24-15-1236 reachieving
begword reacq 1235-15-1-14-12345 reacquire reacquaint
always react =
always reaction 1235-15-1-14-56-1345
sufword readapt =
word readd =
begword readd 1235-15-1-256 readdressing
begword readj = readjust
begword readm = readmit
begword reado = readoption readorn
sufword readout 1235-2-145-1256-2345
begword readv = readvance readvocate
begword reaff 1235-15-1-235
always reagent 1235-15-1-1245-26-2345
begword reagg 1235-15-1-2356 reaggregated
begword realig = realign
begword reallo = reallocate 
sufword realter 1235-15-1-123-2345-12456 realteration
begword rean = reanalyze, reanimate
begword reapp = reappear
begword reasc 1235-15-1-234-14 reascend
begword reass 1235-15-1-234-234
begword reatt = reattach
begword reau = reauthorization
begword reaw = reawaken
begword redat = redated
begword rede =
begmidword redee = unredeemable coredeemed
begword redey 1235-1246-15-13456 redeyed
begword redi =
word redo =
begword redol 1235-1246-135-123 redolent
word redone 1235-15-145-5-135
begword redou 1235-15-145-1256 redouble redoubt 
sufword redound 1235-15-145-46-145
always redu = reduce redundant reduplicate
always redul 1235-1246-136-123 incredulous
begword redy = redyed
always receive 1235-14-1236
contraction rcv
contraction rcvd
contraction rcvr
contraction rcvs
word rcvst =
word rcvth =
always receiving 1235-14-1236-1245
contraction rcvg
begword redis = redistribute
begword redr = redress
begword redro 1235-1246-1235-135 redroot redrock
sufword redrove =
begword redru 1235-1246-1235-136 redruthite
begword refulg = refulgent refugence
always rejoice 1235-245-14
contraction rjc
contraction rjcd
contraction rjcr
contraction rjcs
word rjcst =
word rjcth =
always rejoicing 1235-245-14-1245
contraction rjcg
sufword rejone = rejoneador
sufword renaming 1235-15-1345-1-134-346 renamings
begword renational 1235-15-1345-6-1345-1-123 renationalise renationalization
begword rene = renegotiate
begword renegad 1235-26-15-1245-1-145 renegade
sufword renfrew 1235-26-124-1235-15-2456 Renfrewshire
begword reni = renig
begword renom = renominate
begword renou 1235-15-1345-1256 renounce
sufword renown 1235-15-1345-246-1345 renowned
begword renu = renunciation
begword rer 1235-15-1235 reread
begword rever 1235-15-1236-12456 revere
begword reveren 1235-5-15-26 reverent
sufword reverence 1235-5-15-56-15 reverence
sufword reverie 1235-5-15-24-15
begword rh = Rhadamanthus
always rhein 1235-125-15-35
word riflery =
always right 5-1235
sufword roseann =

# the letter s
endnum s = 40s (no letter sign)
always s 234
always S 234
begword saddlenos 234-1-256-123-15-1345-135-234 saddlenose
word said 234-145
contraction sd
sufword salmon = salmonella
sufword saw = sawhorse
sufword scheherezade 234-16-15-125-12456-15-1356-1-145-15 alternate spelling of Scheherazade
sufword screw = screwhole
always seda =
sufword sedan 234-1246-1-1345
always sedation 234-15-145-6-1345
always sedativ 234-1246-1-2345-24-1236
always sedi =
always sediment 234-1246-24-56-2345
always sedu =
begword sedul 234-1246-136-123 sedulous
sufword sedum 234-1246-136-134
always severe 234-15-1236-12456-15 oversevere severely
always severed 234-5-15-1246 dissevered
word severer 234-15-1236-12456-12456 severe-r (could also be sever-er)
word severers 234-5-15-12456-234
always severit 234-15-1236-12456-24-2345 severities
always severity 234-15-1236-12456-56-13456
word shall 146
word sh =
always sh 146
always shaus = In German names
word shoofly 146-135-135-124-123-13456 shoofly pie
sufword short 146-135-1235-2345 shorthorn
sufword shoshone 146-135-146-135-1345-15 Shoshonean language
always should 146-145
word shd =
always shoulder 146-1256-123-145-12456
begword side = sidenote
sufword sided 234-24-145-1246
sufword sider 234-24-145-12456 sidereal siderite
sufword sing 234-346 singalong
midendword sion 46-1345
begword skedaddl 234-13-15-145-1-256-123 skedaddling
begword stevedor 34-15-1236-1246-135-1235 stevedoring
midendword stion 234-56-1345
word smithereens 234-134-24-2346-1235-15-26-234
word so 234
begword solo = soloensis (anthropology)
always some 5-234
midendword somed 234-135-134-1246 ransomed
always somer 234-135-134-12456 somersault 
always someter 234-135-134-15-2345-12456 gasometer 
always somever 234-135-134-5-15
sufword sparerib 234-1234-345-15-1235-24-12
begword speakeas 234-1234-2-13-15-1-234 speakeasy
sufword speed 234-1234-15-1246 speedometer
always spirit 456-234
begword spreadeagl 234-1234-1235-2-145-15-1-1245-123 spreadeagled
sufword squall = squally
midendword ssword 234-234-45-2456 crossword 
endnum st 34 (first)
word st =
word st. 34-256 Saint Street
always st 34
begword stagh 34-1-1245-125 staghound staghunt
always sth 234-1456
midendword sthole 34-125-135-123-15 blasthole
always sthe 234-2346
midendword sthead 34-125-2-145 masthead
midendword sthof 34-125-12356 Westhoff
always sthood 34-125-135-135-145 priesthood
word still 34
always stime 234-5-2345
midendword stown 234-2345-246-1345 Pickstown
begword styro 34-13456-1235-135 styrofoam
always shead 234-125-2-145
always sheart 234-125-15-345-2345
always shouse 234-125-1256-234-15
always ssh =
always shood =
word such 234-16
endword such 234-16 nonesuch somesuch
before consonant sufword such 234-16
word sch =
sufword schofield 234-16-135-124-24-15-123-145
midword sthous 34-125-1256-234 guesthouse oasthouse masthouse
sufword straw 34-1235-1-2456 strawhat
begword supersed 234-136-1234-12456-234-1246 superseding
always sword =
sufword symoens 234-13456-134-135-26-234 (an author)

# the letter t
always t 2345
always T 2345
sufword takeaway =
sufword tearoom 2345-2-1235-135-135-134 tearooms
endnum th 1456 (fourth, fifth, ...)
word th =
always th 1456
always thand 2345-125-12346 shorthand
word that 2345
always theap 2345-125-2-1234 antheap
midendword theresque 2346-1235-15-234-12345-136-15 Wertheresque
always thill 2345-125-24-123-123 anthill
before apostrophe word this 1456-24-234 this'll
word this 1456
midendword thof 2345-125-12356 Richthofen
midendword thole = bolthole butthole cathole knothole
begword threedim 1456-1235-15-15-145-24-134 threedimensional
word thyself 1456-13456-124
word thyf =
always tnam =
joinword to 235
word today 2345-145
word to-day 2345-145
contraction td
word tomorrow 2345-134
word to-morrow 2345-134
contraction tm
word tonight 2345-1345
word to-night 2345-1345
contraction tn
always thead 2345-125-2-145
always theast 1456-15-1-34
always theart 2345-125-15-345-2345
always thouse 2345-125-1256-234-15
always thoused 2345-125-1256-234-1246 hothoused, penthoused
always thousing 2345-125-1256-234-346 hothousing
lastlargesign the 2346
word themselves 2346-134-1236-234
word themvs 1456-15-134-1236-234
always their 456-2346
always thence 1456-56-15
always there 5-2346
word thereafter 5-2346-1-124
word thereinafter 5-2346-35-1-124
midendword thereal 2346-1235-2-123 ethereal
word thereupon 5-2346-45-136
always thered 2346-1235-1246
always therer 2346-1235-12456
begword theres 2346-1235-15-234 theresa therese 
always thood =
midendword tion 56-1345
always time 5-2345
midendword timed 1245-24-134-1246
midendword timer 2345-24-134-12456
midendword timet = altimeter
word these 45-2346
always through 5-1456
always together 2345-1245-1235
contraction tgr
word those 45-1456
begword trans = transtype
sufword tranship 2345-1235-1-1345-146-24-1234
begword trinod = trinodal
begword trinom = trinomial
begword tubenos = tubenosed
sufword tuberose =
begword tweedled 2345-2456-15-1246-123-15-145 tweedledee
begword typea = typeahead

# the letter u
always u 136
always U 136
begword un = unameliorated
begword unb = unblemished
begword underea 5-136-15-1 undereat
begword underear 5-136-15-345
begword undis = undisturbed
begword unea = uneaten uneasy
begword unear 136-1345-15-345 unearth unearned
begword unful = unfulfilled
word upon 45-136 Dupont
word us 136
sufword ussher 136-234-146-12456 James Ussher
always under 5-136
word unsaid 136-1345-234-145

# the letter v
always v 1236
always V 1236
begword vaing 1236-1-35-1245 vainglory
word vandyke =
word very 1236
begword vice = viceroy
sufword vicenza 1236-24-14-26-1356-1
sufword video = videofile
